test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UN_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ta kún - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UN_STEM_1

     ta kún+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ta kún
     ta kún+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún.ga
     ta kún+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún
     ta kún+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún.gang
     ta kún+V+DIRECT+PAST: ta kún.gan
     ta kún+V+RELATIVE: ta kúns
     ta kún+V+NON_FACTIVE: ta kúnang
     ta kún+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún.gang
     ta kún+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún.ganggang
     ta kún+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún.gangang
     ta kún+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún.giinii
     ta kún+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún.gaangaa
     ta kún+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún.gaangaan
     ta kún+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ta kúnäsaa
     ta kún+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ta kúnäs
     ta kún+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ta kúnäsaang
     ta kún+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ta kúnäsga
     ta kún+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ta kúnäsaas
     ta kún+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ta kúnäsaa.ang
     ta kún+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asa'áa
     ta kún+V+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asa'áang
     ta kún+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asaasdláa
     ta kún+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asaasdláang
     ta kún+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún'uuj
     ta kún+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'uujang
     ta kún+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ta kúnäsaa'uujang
     ta kún+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ta kún'us
     ta kún+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ta kún'ujaa
     ta kún+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'uujaangaa
     ta kún+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ta kúnäsaa'us
     ta kún+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ta kúnäsaa'ahlans
     ta kún+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ta kúnäseehl
     ta kún+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ta kún'uu
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún'waa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'waa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'waang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ta kún'wägan
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ta kún'aawaa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ta kún'aawaan
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ta kún'waas
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ta kún'aawaas
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'waa.ang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'aawaa.ang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún.gang'waa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún.gang'waang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún.gang'waa.ang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'wägiinii
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'wägaangaa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'wägaangaan
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ta kún'waaäsaa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ta kún'waaäs
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ta kún'waaäsaang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ta kún'waaäsga
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ta kún'waaäsaas
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'waaäsaa.ang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún'waa'uuj
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'waa'uujang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ta kún'waaäsaa'uujang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ta kún'waa'us
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ta kún'waa'ujaa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'waa'uujaangaa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ta kún'waaäsaa'us
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ta kún'waa'ahlanggang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ta kún'waa'ahlanggan
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ta kún'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ta kún'waa'ahlans
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ta kún'aawaa'ahlang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ta kún'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ta kún'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ta kún'waa'ahl
     ta kún+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ta kún'waaäseehl
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ta kún'ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún'angga
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'anggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: ta kún'anggan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ta kún'aangaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: ta kún'aangaan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: ta kún'ans
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ta kún'aangaas
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'angang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'aangaa.ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún'anggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún.gang'anggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún.gang'angang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'anggiinii
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'anggaangaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'anggaangaan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ta kún'angäsaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ta kún'angäs
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ta kún'angäsaang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ta kún'angäsga
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ta kún'angäsaas
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'angäsaa.ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asaa'áng
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asaa'ánggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kúnang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'uuj
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'uujang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ta kún'angäsaa'uujang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'us
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ta kún'ang'ujaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'ang'uujaangaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ta kún'angäsaa'us
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ta kún'aang'ahlanggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: ta kún'aang'ahlanggan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'aang'ahlanggiinii
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ta kún'angäsaa'ahlans
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ta kún'aang'ahlans
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: ta kún'aangaa'ahlang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ta kún'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ta kún'aangaa'ahlanggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: ta kún'aang'ahl
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ta kún'angäseehl
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ta kún'ang'uu
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'waa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'waa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'waang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ta kún'ang'wägan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ta kún'ang'aawaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ta kún'ang'aawaan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ta kún'ang'waas
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ta kún'ang'aawaas
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'ang'waa.ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'ang'aawaa.ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún.gang'ang'waa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ta kún.gang'ang'waang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún.gang'ang'waa.ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'ang'wägiinii
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'ang'wägaangaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'ang'wägaangaan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ta kún'ang'waaäsaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ta kún'ang'waaäs
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ta kún'ang'waaäsaang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ta kún'ang'waaäsga
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ta kún'ang'waaäsaas
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ta kún'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ta kún'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'waa'uuj
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'waa'uujang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ta kún'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'waa'us
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ta kún'ang'waa'ujaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ta kún'ang'waaäsaa'us
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ta kún'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ta kún'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ta kún'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ta kún'ang'waa'ahlans
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ta kún'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ta kún'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ta kún'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ta kún'ang'waa'ahl
     ta kún+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ta kún'ang'waaäseehl
